Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 45. Private and Denominational Schools.

Administrative Code. —

For corporal punishment in private schools, see 4 AAC 42.200.

Collateral references. —

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 807 et seq.

Public payment of tuition, scholarship, or the like, as respects sectarian school. 81 ALR2d 1309.

Tort liability of private schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents due to condition of buildings, equipment or outside premises. 35 ALR3d 975.

Tort liability of private schools and institutions of higher learning for negligence of, or lack of supervision by, teachers and other employees or agents. 38 ALR3d 908.

Constitutionality, under state constitutional provision forbidding financial aid to religious sects, of public provision of school bus service for private school pupils. 41 ALR3d 344.

What constitutes a private, parochial, or denominational school within statute making attendance at such school a compliance with compulsory school attendance law. 65 ALR3d 1222.

Validity of state or local government regulation requiring private school to report attendance and similar information to government—post-Yoder cases. 8 ALR5th 875.